Tennessee, session 114, SB1778.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 58-2-109(c), is amended by
designating the existing language as subdivision (c)(1) and adding the following as subdivisions
(c)(2) and (c)(3):
(2) Disaster grants administered by the agency are exempt from the
requirements of title 12, chapter 3, related to procurement, except that:
(A) Section 12-3-602 applies to such disaster grants; and
(B) The agency must establish procedures to monitor recipient and
subrecipient compliance with disaster response and disaster grant terms and
conditions.
(3) As used in this subsection (c):
(A) "Disaster grant" means a grant or subgrant awarded to the state or
awarded by the state to a person or legal entity, for the furnishing of assistance
by the state, whether financial or otherwise, to any person or entity to support a
disaster response and recovery assistance program authorized by law;
(B) "Recipient" means a person or entity that directly receives a disaster
grant from a federal or state agency to carry out an activity of a disaster response
and recovery assistance program; and
(C) "Subrecipient" means a person or entity that receives a disaster grant
from a recipient to carry out a disaster response and recovery assistance
program.
SB1778
010156
- 1 -

SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 010156